Wisconsin, session 2025, SB378.
do enact as follows:SB378,11Section 1. 5.05 (19) of the statutes is created to read:SB378,2,525.05 (19) Deadlines concerning presidential elections. The commission 3shall publish on its website a table setting forth each day or deadline on or by which 4an act or event is required by law to occur in a presidential election, including with 5respect to recounts and recount appeals.SB378,26Section 2. 7.51 (5) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB378,3,1677.51 (5) (b) The municipal clerk shall deliver all ballots, statements, tally 8sheets, lists, and envelopes relating to a school district election to the school district 9clerk, excluding any provisional ballots, by 4 p.m. on the day following each such 1election and shall deliver to the school district clerk any amended statements, tally 2sheets, and lists for additional provisional ballots canvassed under s. 6.97 (4) no 3later than 4 p.m. on the Monday after the election. The municipal clerk shall 4deliver to the county clerk the ballots, statements, tally sheets, lists, and envelopes 5for his or her municipality relating to any county, technical college district, state, or 6national election no later than 4 p.m. on the day following each such election or, in 7municipalities where absentee ballots are canvassed under s. 7.52, by 4 p.m. on the 82nd day following each such election, and shall deliver to the county clerk any 9additional provisional ballots canvassed under s. 6.97 (4) together with amended 10statements, tally sheets, lists, and envelopes no later than 4 p.m. on the Monday 11after the election or, notwithstanding s. 990.001 (4) (c), for a presidential election, 12no later than 9 a.m. on the Saturday after the election. The county clerk shall 13maintain office hours on that Saturday as necessary to receive such filings in a 14presidential election. The person delivering the returns shall be paid out of the 15municipal treasury. Each clerk shall retain ballots, statements, tally sheets, or 16envelopes received by the clerk until destruction is authorized under s. 7.23 (1).SB378,317Section 3. 7.53 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB378,5,3187.53 (1) (a) Where the municipality constitutes one ward or combines all 19wards to utilize a single polling place under s. 5.15 (6) (b), the canvass of the votes 20cast at the polling place shall be conducted publicly under s. 7.51 and the 21inspectors, other than any inspector appointed under s. 7.30 (1) (b), shall act as the 22municipal board of canvassers. The inspectors shall then complete the return 23statement for all votes cast at the polling place. If there are no provisional ballots 1that are eligible to be counted under s. 6.97 and no absentee ballots are being 2canvassed under s. 7.52, the inspectors may complete and sign the canvass 3statement and determination on election night. In municipalities where absentee 4ballots are canvassed under s. 7.52, after the canvass of the absentee ballots is 5completed under s. 7.52, the board of absentee ballot canvassers shall reconcile the 6poll list of the electors who vote by absentee ballot with the corresponding poll list of 7the electors who vote in person to ensure that no elector is allowed to cast more than 8one ballot. If an elector who votes in person has submitted an absentee ballot, the 9absentee ballot is void. Except as authorized in par. (b), if one or more electors of 10the municipality have cast provisional ballots that are eligible to be counted under 11s. 6.97, the inspectors, acting as the board of canvassers, shall reconvene no later 12than 9 a.m. on the Monday after the election, or no later than 4 p.m. on the Friday 13after a presidential election, to count the valid provisional ballots and shall adjust 14the returns accordingly. The inspectors, acting as the board of canvassers, need not 15reconvene if the municipal clerk certifies that he or she has received no provisional 16ballots from the time that the board of canvassers completed the initial canvass and 174 p.m. on the Friday after the election. Upon completion of the canvass under this 18paragraph and any canvass that is conducted under s. 7.52 and ascertainment of 19the results by the inspectors or, in municipalities where absentee ballots are 20canvassed under s. 7.52, by the inspectors and the board of absentee ballot 21canvassers, the municipal clerk shall publicly read to the inspectors or the board of 22absentee ballot canvassers the names of the persons voted for and the number of 23votes for each person for each municipal office, the names of the persons declared by 1the inspectors or board of absentee ballot canvassers to have won nomination or 2election to each municipal office, and the number of votes cast for and against each 3municipal referendum question.SB378,44Section 4. 7.53 (2) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB378,6,457.53 (2) (d) In municipalities with one polling place, the canvass shall be 6conducted under sub. (1) publicly on election night. In other municipalities, the 7municipal board of canvassers shall publicly canvass the returns of every election. 8The canvass shall begin no earlier than the time that the municipal board of 9canvassers receives the returns from all polling places in the municipality on 10election night and no later than 9 a.m. on the Monday after the election, except that, 11for a presidential election, the canvass shall begin no later than 5 p.m. on the Friday 12after the election. After any canvass of the absentee ballots is completed under s. 137.52, the board of canvassers shall reconcile the poll list of the electors who vote by 14absentee ballot with the corresponding poll list of the electors who vote in person to 15ensure that no elector is allowed to cast more than one ballot. If an elector who 16votes in person has submitted an absentee ballot, the absentee ballot is void. At the 17spring election, the board of canvassers shall publicly declare the results on or 18before the 3rd Tuesday in April. The board of canvassers shall prepare a statement 19showing the results of each election for any municipal office and each municipal 20referendum. After each primary for municipal offices, the board of canvassers shall 21prepare a statement certifying the names of those persons who have won 22nomination to office. After each other election for a municipal office and each 23municipal referendum, the board of canvassers shall prepare a determination 1showing the names of the persons who are elected to each municipal office and the 2results of each municipal referendum. The board of canvassers shall file each 3statement and determination in the office of the municipal clerk or board of election 4commissioners.SB378,55Section 5. 7.60 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB378,7,367.60 (3) Canvassing. Not later than 9 a.m. on the Tuesday after each election 7the county board of canvassers shall open and publicly examine the returns, except 8that, for a presidential election, the board of canvassers shall open and publicly 9examine the returns not later than noon on the Saturday after the election. If 10returns have not been received from any election district or ward in the county, they 11shall dispatch a messenger and the person having them shall deliver the returns to 12the messenger the district attorney of the county shall immediately initiate an 13enforcement action under s. 5.07 to obtain the returns in the circuit court for that 14county or before the circuit judge appointed under s. 9.01 (6) (b) to hear recount 15appeals in the presidential election. If, on examination, any of the returns received 16are so informal or defective that the board cannot intelligently canvass them, they 17shall dispatch a messenger to deliver the returns back to the municipal board of 18canvassers with written specifications of the informalities or defects and command 19them to immediately complete the returns or remedy the defects in the manner 20required and deliver them to the messenger. Every messenger shall safely keep all 21returns, show them to no one but the municipal clerk and board of canvassers and 22deliver them to the county clerk with all possible dispatch. To acquire the necessary 23full returns and remedy any informalities or defects the county board of canvassers 1may adjourn not longer than one day at a time nor more than 2 days in all, except 2that, for a presidential election, the board of canvassers may adjourn only to the 3extent permitted by the commission.SB378,64Section 6. 7.60 (5) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB378,8,257.60 (5) (a) Immediately following the canvass, the county clerk shall deliver 6or transmit to the elections commission a certified copy of each statement of the 7county board of canvassers for president and vice president, state officials, senators 8and representatives in congress, state legislators, justice, court of appeals judge, 9circuit judge, district attorney, and metropolitan sewerage commissioners, if the 10commissioners are elected under s. 200.09 (11) (am). The statement shall record 11the returns for each office or referendum by ward, unless combined returns are 12authorized under s. 5.15 (6) (b) in which case the statement shall record the returns 13for each group of combined wards. Following primaries the county clerk shall 14enclose on forms prescribed by the elections commission the names, party or 15principle designation, if any, and number of votes received by each candidate 16recorded in the same manner. The county clerk shall deliver or transmit the 17certified statement to the elections commission no later than 9 days after each 18primary except the partisan primary, no later than 10 days after the partisan 19primary and any other election except the general election, and no later than 14 20days after the general election except a presidential election. The county clerk shall 21deliver or transmit the certified statement to the elections commission no later than 226 days after a presidential election. The board of canvassers shall deliver or 1transmit a certified copy of each statement for any technical college district 2referendum to the secretary of the technical college district board.SB378,73Section 7. 7.70 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB378,8,2147.70 (1) (b) If any county clerk fails or neglects to forward any statements, the 5commission chairperson or the chairperson’s designee may require the clerk to do so 6immediately, and if the statements are not received by the 8th day after a primary, 7by the 7th day after a presidential election, or by the 11th day after any other 8election, the commission may dispatch a special messenger to obtain them 9chairperson or the chairperson’s designee shall immediately notify the county clerk, 10in writing, that failure to immediately forward the statements constitutes a 11violation of law that will result in an immediate enforcement action under s. 5.05 12(1) (d). If the commission does not receive the statements within one day after such 13written notice is delivered to the county clerk, the commission shall immediately 14initiate an enforcement action under s. 5.05 (1) (d) to obtain the statements in the 15circuit court for that county or before the circuit judge appointed under s. 9.01 (6) 16(b) to hear recount appeals in the presidential election. Whenever it appears upon 17the face of any statement that an error has been made in reporting or computing, 18the commission may return it to the county clerk for correction. The county clerk 19shall make the necessary corrections and return the statement to the commission 20no later than 3 days after the county clerk receives the statement from the 21commission for correction.SB378,822Section 8. 7.70 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB378,9,7237.70 (3) (a) The Except for a presidential election, the chairperson of the 1commission or a designee of the chairperson appointed by the chairperson to 2canvass a specific election shall publicly canvass the returns and make his or her 3certifications and determinations on or before the 2nd Tuesday following a spring 4primary,; the 15th day of May following a spring election,; the 3rd Wednesday 5following a partisan primary,; the first day of December following a general 6election,; the 2nd Thursday following a special primary,; or within 18 days after any 7special election.SB378,98Section 9. 7.70 (3) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB378,9,1197.70 (3) (c) The Except for a presidential election, the chairperson of the 10commission or the chairperson’s designee shall conclude the state canvass within 1110 days after its commencement.SB378,1012Section 10. 7.70 (3) (cm) of the statutes is created to read:SB378,9,16137.70 (3) (cm) For a presidential election, the chairperson of the commission or 14the chairperson’s designee shall conclude the state canvass and make his or her 15certifications and determinations no later than 16 days after the date of the 16presidential election.SB378,1117Section 11. 7.70 (3) (i) of the statutes is amended to read:SB378,9,24187.70 (3) (i) The commission chairperson or the chairperson’s designee shall 19canvass only regular returns made by the county board of canvassers and shall not 20count or canvass any additional or supplemental returns or statements made by the 21county board or any other board or person. The commission chairperson or the 22chairperson’s designee shall not count or canvass any statement or return which 23has been made by the county board of canvassers at any other time than that 24provided in s. 7.60. If, by the 16th day after the date of the election in a presidential 1election, a county board of canvassers fails to certify a statement or return under s. 27.60 (4) or a county clerk fails to deliver or transmit a statement or return to the 3commission under s. 7.60 (5) (a), the commission chairperson or the chairperson’s 4designee shall canvass the unofficial returns for the county on the basis of all the 5returns canvassed by all municipalities in that county under s. 7.53. This provision 6does not apply to any return made subsequent to a recount under s. 9.01, when the 7return is accepted in lieu of any prior return from the same county for the same 8office; or to a statement given to the commission chairperson or chairperson’s 9designee or a messenger sent by the chairperson or designee to obtain a correction.SB378,1210Section 12. 7.70 (5) (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB378,10,12117.70 (5) (title) Certificates of election; certificates of ascertainment 12of appointment of electors.SB378,1313Section 13. 7.70 (5) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB378,11,9147.70 (5) (a) The commission shall record in its office each certified statement 15and determination made by the commission chairperson or the chairperson’s 16designee. Immediately after the expiration of the time allowed to file a petition for 17recount, the commission shall make and transmit to each person declared elected a 18certificate of election under the seal of the commission, except that the commission 19need not wait until expiration of the time allowed to file a petition for recount if 20there is no aggrieved party, as defined in s. 9.01 (1) (a) 5. It shall also prepare 21similar certificates, attested by the commission administrator, addressed to the 22U.S. house of representatives, stating the names of those persons elected as 23representatives to the congress from this state. In the case of U.S. senators, the 24commission shall prepare a certificate of election for the governor’s signature, and 1the governor shall sign and affix the great seal of the state and transmit the 2certificate to the president of the U.S. senate. The certificate shall be 3countersigned by the secretary of state. If a person elected was elected to fill a 4vacancy, the certificate shall so indicate. When a valid petition for recount is filed, 5the commission chairperson or the chairperson’s designee may not certify a 6nomination, and the governor or commission may not issue a certificate of election 7until the recount has been completed and the time allowed for filing an appeal has 8passed, or if appealed until the appeal is decided. This paragraph does not apply to 9presidential elections.SB378,1410Section 14. 7.70 (5) (b) of the statutes is renumbered 7.70 (5) (b) 1. and 11amended to read:SB378,12,7127.70 (5) (b) 1. For a presidential electors election, the commission shall record 13each certified statement and determination made by the commission chairperson or 14the chairperson’s designee. The commission shall prepare a the certificate of 15ascertainment of appointment of presidential electors required under 3 USC 5 16showing the determination of the results of the canvass and the names of the 17persons elected, and the governor shall sign, affix the great seal of the state, and 18transmit issue the certificate by signing, affixing the great seal of the state, and 19transmitting the certificate as soon as possible, but no later than the 6th day before 20the date on which the presidential electors are to convene under s. 7.75 (1), by 21registered mail the most expeditious method available, as determined by the 22governor, to the U.S. administrator of general services archivist of the United 23States. The certificate shall contain at least one security feature, as determined by 24the governor, for the purpose of verifying the authenticity of the certificate. The 1secure components of any security feature used to verify the authenticity of a 2certificate are confidential and not subject to disclosure under s. 19.35. The 3governor shall issue and transmit the certificate no later than 2 days after the 4commission prepares the certificate, except as provided under subd. 2. The 5governor shall also prepare 6 duplicate originals of such certificate and deliver 6them to one of the presidential electors on or before the first Monday Tuesday after 7the 2nd Wednesday in December.SB378,158Section 15. 7.70 (5) (b) 2. of the statutes is created to read:SB378,13,597.70 (5) (b) 2. The fact that a recount petition has been filed, or that a recount 10or recount appeal is pending, has no effect on the governor’s duty to issue a 11certificate of ascertainment of appointment of electors not later than the 6th day 12before the date on which the presidential electors are to convene under s. 7.75 (1), as 13required under subd. 1. and 3 USC 5 (a) (1), and has no effect on the commission 14chairperson’s or the chairperson’s designee’s duty to make a determination in the 15presidential election and prepare a certificate of ascertainment of appointment of 16electors for the governor’s signature. However, if a valid recount petition is filed 17under s. 9.01 (1), the governor may not issue the certificate required under subd. 1. 18until the completion and certification of the recount or until 3 p.m. on the 6th day 19before the date on which the presidential electors are to convene under s. 7.75 (1), 20whichever occurs first. If the recount is completed and certified before 3 p.m. on the 216th day before the date on which the presidential electors are to convene under s. 227.75 (1), and all recount appeals have been waived or exhausted, the certificate 23issued by the governor shall reflect the certified result of that recount or, if 24applicable, recount appeal. If a recount is not completed and certified before 3 p.m. 1on the 6th day before the date on which the presidential electors are to convene 2under s. 7.75 (1), the governor shall issue the certificate subject to s. 9.01 (9m). If a 3recount appeal is ongoing at the time at which the governor must issue the 4certificate under this subdivision, a superseding certificate may be issued only in 5accordance with s. 9.01 (9) (cm).SB378,166Section 16. 7.70 (5) (b) 3. of the statutes is created to read:SB378,13,1477.70 (5) (b) 3. A superseding certificate of ascertainment of appointment of 8electors issued by the governor under s. 9.01 (9) (cm) or (9m) or pursuant to a state 9or federal court order supersedes any prior certificate of ascertainment of 10appointment of electors issued under subd. 1., shall be transmitted consistent with 11the requirements under subd. 1. for the certificate of ascertainment of appointment 12of electors, and is conclusive with respect to the determination of this state’s 13presidential electors for purposes of the meeting of presidential electors under s. 147.75.SB378,1715Section 17. 7.75 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB378,13,23167.75 (1) The electors for president and vice president shall meet at the state 17capitol following the presidential election at 12:00 noon the first Monday Tuesday 18after the 2nd Wednesday in December to cast and transmit their electoral votes 19pursuant to 3 USC 7 to 11. If there is a vacancy in the office of an elector due to 20death, refusal to act, failure to attend or other cause, the electors present shall 21immediately proceed to fill by ballot, by a plurality of votes, the electoral college 22vacancy. When all electors are present, or the vacancies filled, they shall perform 23their required duties under the constitution and laws of the United States.SB378,1824Section 18. 9.01 (1) (ar) 3. of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb378 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb378 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB378 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB378 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB378: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting